Utah statutes.
9-8-506.   Charitable contribution for tax purposes.

Any conveyance of a preservation easement may be deemed a charitable contribution for tax purposes in accordance with the laws, rules, and regulations pertaining to charitable contributions of interests in real property.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 241, 1992 General Session

